Tennessee, session 114, HB2408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 4, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The commission shall include with the annual report required under § 65-1-111, a
separate report regarding compliance with this part to the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over commerce and the chair of the
commerce and labor committee of the senate.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2408
012769
- 1 -